Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-828.04
Squad leader; squad member; employment; operations; responsibilities.

(1) A squad leader or squad member of the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team shall have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to employment of such leader or member by the State Fire Marshal or the Nebraska Forest Service.

(2) Each squad leader is responsible for the organization, administration, and operation of the squad to which the squad leader is assigned.

(3) While operating under the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team, each squad leader and squad member are subject to the operational control of the State Fire Marshal.

(4) While operating under the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team, each squad member assigned to a wildland fire incident is subject to the operational control of the squad leader assigned to such wildland fire incident.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 23.